Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202545-362
Preauthorized loans; insurance.

In addition to the charges permitted under section 45-361, a licensee may contract for and receive the fees, costs, and expenses permitted by the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act on other loans, subject to all the conditions and restrictions set forth in the act with the following variations:

(1) If credit life or disability insurance is provided and if the insured dies or becomes disabled when there is an outstanding preauthorized loan indebtedness, the insurance shall be sufficient to pay the total balance of the loan due on the date of the borrower's death or the amount due as of the end of the previous billing cycle, whichever is less, in the case of credit life insurance, or all minimum payments which become due on the loan during the covered period of disability in the case of credit disability insurance. The additional charge for credit life insurance or credit disability insurance shall be calculated in each billing cycle by applying the current monthly premium rate for such insurance, as such rate may be determined by the Director of Insurance, to the unpaid balances in the borrower's account, using either of the methods specified in section 45-361 for the calculation of loan charges;

(2) No credit life or disability insurance written in connection with a preauthorized loan shall be canceled by the licensee because of delinquency of the borrower in the making of the required minimum payments on the loan unless one or more of such payments is past due for a period of ninety days or more, and the licensee shall advance to the insurer the amounts required to keep the insurance in force during such period, which amounts may be debited to the borrower's account;

(3) The department may, by rule and regulation or order, require a statement of insurance that will be appropriate for preauthorized loans in lieu of that required by section 45-359; and

(4) The amount, terms, and conditions of any insurance against loss or damage to property must be reasonable in relation to the character and value of the property insured and the maximum anticipated amount of credit to be extended.

Laws 2025, LB474, § 83.